Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 345.010 to
345.340.
SECTION 2. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may seek  an injunction
against a person or career school that is engaged, has engaged or is  about to engage in any
activity in violation of ORS 345.010 to 345.340 or any rule adopted under  the authority of ORS
345.010 to 345.340.
(2) An injunction sought under subsection (1) of this  section may be sought in the Circuit
Court for Marion County or in the circuit court  for the county in which the activity is oc-
curring, has occurred or is about to occur.
(3) An injunction sought under subsection (1) of this section may  require the person or
career school to:
(a) Refrain from the activity;
(b) Take any action necessary to remedy the violation; or
(c) Take any action necessary as  a result of the violation to protect the health, safety
or welfare of students enrolled at the career school.
(4) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may obtain an injunction  under sub-
section (1) of this section:
(a) Regardless of whether an adequate remedy at law exists; and
(b) In addition to any other legal remedy provided by law.
(5) Any regulatory enforcement  action taken by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission regarding an alleged violation of ORS 345.010 to 345.340  or any rule adopted un-
der the authority of ORS 345.010 to 345.340:
(a) Is not a bar to an action seeking an injunction  under subsection (1) of this section;
and
(b) Does not relieve the person or  career school from prosecution or any other enforce-
ment action.
Enrolled House Bill 3027 (HB 3027-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3027 (HB 3027-INTRO) Page 2